Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB255.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 82GREEN VEHICLE PILOT PROGRAMSec.8201. Definitions.8202. Program guidelines.8203. Expiration.§ 8201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual who resides in this Commonwealth 1234567891011121314151617 and owns or leases a green vehicle and who applies to participate in the program."Battery electric vehicle." A motor vehicle that is only powered by an electric motor drawing current from a rechargeable energy storage system."Commission." The Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission."Green vehicle." Any of the following:(1) Battery electric vehicle.(2) Hybrid electric vehicle.(3) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle."Hybrid electric vehicle." A motor vehicle that is powered from onboard sources of stored energy that are both an internal combustion engine using combustible fuel and a rechargeable energy storage system."Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle." A motor vehicle powered by an electric motor drawing current from a rechargeable energy storage system, but also has an onboard combustion engine."Program." The Green Vehicle Pilot Program established under section 8202 (relating to program guidelines).§ 8202. Program guidelines.(a) Establishment.--The Green Vehicle Pilot Program is established to incentivize Commonwealth residents to purchase green vehicles.(b) Form.--The commission shall develop a form for an applicant to complete and submit to the commission after the purchase of a green vehicle to participate in the program.(c) Submission.--An applicant shall submit a completed form under subsection (b) along with a copy of the green vehicle's registration to the commission.(d) Credit.--20250HB0255PN0166 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) After the receipt of the information required under subsection (c), the commission shall issue an applicant a credit that shall be used for toll charges on the Pennsylvania Turnpike in the following amounts:(i) One hundred dollars for hybrid electric vehicles.(ii) Two hundred dollars for plug-in hybrid electric vehicles.(iii) Two hundred dollars for battery electric vehicles.(2) Only one credit amount under paragraph (1) may be issued per applicant.(e) Regulations.--The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the implementation of the program.§ 8203. Expiration.This chapter shall expire five years from the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0255PN0166 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819